apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <pardef n="ӕфс/ад__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ад</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ады</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адӕн</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адмӕ</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адӕй</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ады</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адыл</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адау</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>адимӕ</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтӕ</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдты</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтӕн</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтмӕ</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтӕй</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдты</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтыл</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтау</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕдтимӕ</l>
          <r>ад<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="къаб/аз__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аз</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азы</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азӕн</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азмӕ</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азӕй</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азы</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азыл</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азау</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>азимӕ</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтӕ</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзты</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтӕн</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтмӕ</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтӕй</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзты</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтыл</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтау</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕзтимӕ</l>
          <r>аз<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ӕрт/ах__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахы</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахӕн</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахмӕ</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахӕй</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахы</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахыл</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахау</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ахимӕ</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтӕ</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхты</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтӕн</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтмӕ</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтӕй</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхты</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтыл</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтау</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕхтимӕ</l>
          <r>ах<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ӕфсад"><i>ӕфс</i><par n="ӕфс/ад__n"/></e>
    <e lm="къабаз"><i>къаб</i><par n="къаб/аз__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕртах"><i>ӕрт</i><par n="ӕрт/ах__n"/></e>
